New York, session 2025-2026, S4261.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general municipal law is amended by adding a new 2 section 208-i to read as follows: 3 § 208-i. Hazardous pay differential for emergency medical technicians 4 and advanced emergency medical technicians. 1. Any employee of the city 5 of New York or the New York city health and hospitals corporation in a 6 title whose duties are those of an emergency medical technician or 7 advanced emergency medical technician, as such terms are defined in 8 section three thousand one of the public health law, or in a title whose 9 duties require the supervision of employees whose duties are those of an 10 emergency medical technician or advanced emergency medical technician, 11 as such terms are defined in section three thousand one of the public 12 health law, shall be entitled to a hazardous pay differential for work 13 performed in connection with the provision of emergency medical treat- 14 ment, as defined in section three thousand-a of the public health law, 15 during an outbreak of an infectious disease affecting New York city. 16 2. The hazardous pay differential shall be calculated at the rate of 17 the employee's regular rate of pay, plus ten percent. The amounts 18 received as hazardous pay pursuant to the provisions of this section 19 shall be regarded as salary or compensation for the purposes of any 20 pension or retirement system of which the employee receiving such pay is 21 a member. Such hazardous pay shall not be regarded as salary or compen- 22 sation for the purpose of determining the right to any increase of sala- 23 ry or any salary increment on account of length of service or otherwise, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05837-01-5 S. 4261 2 1 nor shall the payment of such hazardous pay be construed to constitute a 2 promotion. 3 3. For purposes of this section, an outbreak of an infectious disease 4 shall be deemed to occur in any of the following circumstances: (a) 5 during the period in which the governor declares a state disaster emer- 6 gency arising from an infectious disease pursuant to section twenty- 7 eight of the executive law; (b) during the period in which the secretary 8 of health and human services declares a public health emergency due to 9 the significant outbreak of infectious diseases pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 10 247d; (c) during the period in which the president declares a national 11 emergency due to infectious disease pursuant to 50 U.S.C. 1621; or (d) 12 during the period in which the president declares an emergency pursuant 13 to 42 U.S.C. 5191. The differential pay to which covered employees are 14 entitled shall commence on the date of any such declaration and shall 15 remain in effect until all applicable declarations have been rescinded. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.